Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-503.03
Chlamydia or gonorrhea; prescription
oral antibiotic drugs; rules and regulations.

The Department of Health and Human Services
may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out section 71-503.02.

Laws 2013, LB528, § 2.